California statutes. Public Contract Code
(B) The project or contract is being performed under the City of Elk Grove Community
 Workforce and Training Agreement executed in January 2023, or an extension or renewal of that agreement.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(c) Subcontractors that were not listed by a construction manager at-risk entity as partners, general partners, or association members in a partnership, limited partnership, or association in the entity’s construction manager at-risk bid submission shall be awarded by the construction manager at-risk entity in accordance with the process set forth by the city. All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this section shall be afforded the protections contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1. The construction manager at-risk entity shall do both of the
 following:

(1) Provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the city.

(2) Provide a fixed date and time on which the subcontracted work will be awarded in accordance with the procedure established pursuant to this section.

(d) If the city elects to proceed under this section and uses a construction manager at-risk contract for a construction project, it shall make a copy of the contract available for public inspection on its internet website.

(e) (1) If the city elects to award a project pursuant to this section, retention proceeds withheld by the city from the construction manager at-risk entity shall not
 exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond issued by an admitted surety insurer is required in the solicitation of bids.

(2) In a contract between the construction manager at-risk entity and any subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the city and the construction manager at-risk entity. If the construction manager at-risk entity provides written notice to any subcontractor that is not a member of the construction manager at-risk entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required, and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the construction manager at-risk entity, then the construction manager at-risk entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the city
 and the construction manager at-risk entity from any payment made by the construction manager at-risk entity to the subcontractor.

(f) As used in this section:

(1) “Best value” means a value determined by objective criteria related to the experience of the entity and project personnel, project plan, financial strength of the entity, safety record of the entity, and price.

(2) “City” means the City of Elk Grove.

(3) “Construction manager at-risk contract” means one or a successive combination of competitively procured contracts entered into by the city with an individual, partnership, joint venture, corporation, or other recognized legal entity, that is appropriately licensed in this state, including holding a contractor’s license issued by the
 Contractors State License Board, and that guarantees the cost of a project and furnishes construction management services, including, but not limited to, preparation and coordination of bid packages, scheduling, cost control, value engineering, evaluation, preconstruction services, and construction administration.

(4) “Project labor agreement” means a prehire collective bargaining agreement covering employees in the building and construction industry that establishes terms and conditions of employment for the project or contract.

(5) “Zoo project” or “project” means the new zoo proposed to be relocated from the City of Sacramento and constructed over time, with buildings, including repair of structures, landscaping, habitat, site work, and flatwork, in the City of Elk Grove and its associated public infrastructure, including, but not limited to, roadway in the vicinity of the new
 zoo, excluding any roadway owned and maintained by the State of California through the Department of Transportation, and utility improvements in any way associated with the new zoo.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   (SB 739)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Local Agencies—Earthquake Relief [20185. - 20189.]

20185.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts awarded by local agencies for earthquake relief subject to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54125) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20186.

Any resolution authorizing bonds may provide that the bonds may recite that it is issued pursuant to this chapter and bonds containing such recital are conclusively deemed valid and issued in conformity with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20187.

Reference on the face of bonds to the resolution by its date of adoption incorporates the resolution and of this chapter the bonds and their coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20188.

Each taker and subsequent holder of the bonds and attached or detached coupons has recourse to all of the provisions of the resolution and of this chapter and is bound by their terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20189.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the local agency.

(c) A certified check made payable to the local agency.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the local agency.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the local agency beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Municipal Utility Districts [20190. - 20192.]

20190.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts subject to the Municipal Utility District Act provided for in Division 6 (commencing with Section 11501) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20191.

Any district operating utility works may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this division requiring approval of indebtedness, loans from any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of financing the construction of office buildings, warehouses, and garages for the district, and the acquisition of sites therefor, with appurtenances necessary or convenient thereto. The evidence of the district’s indebtedness shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

As used in this section, “construction” includes the meaning of “reconstruction,” “repair,” “improve,” “remodeling,” “rehabilitation,’ ’ and “completion.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20192.

(a) Whenever the cost of construction of any office building, warehouse, or garage of the district constructed under Section 20191 exceeds the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), the district shall adopt plans and specifications and working details, as may be proper, and shall advertise for bids for the work in accordance with the plans and specifications so adopted. All bidders shall be afforded an opportunity to examine the plans and specifications and the district shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(b) All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(3) A certified check made payable to the district.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(c) The person or corporation to whom the contract is awarded shall be required to execute a bond for the faithful performance of the contract. The form of the bond shall be approved by the board of directors. In cases of great emergency and when necessary to protect life and property, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may without advertising for bids therefor, have the work done by day labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Public Utility Districts [20200. - 20201.5.]

20200.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts subject to the Public Utility District Act provided for in Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 23.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20201.

Every complete project for new construction or project for any alteration, maintenance, or repair, if the costs of materials, supplies and labor exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The board shall adopt plans and specifications, strain sheets, and working details and shall advertise for bids for the project in accordance with the plans and specifications so adopted. Notice inviting bids for all projects shall be published in a newspaper in the district at least one week prior to the time specified for receiving bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20201.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Public Utility Districts [20202.1. - 20207.7.]

20202.1.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by public utility districts as provided for in the Public Utility District Act pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20202.2.

A district may make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20204.1.

All bidders shall be afforded an opportunity to examine such plans and specifications, and the board shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder. The plans and specifications adopted shall be attached to and become part of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20204.2.

The person or corporation to whom the contract is awarded shall execute a bond, to be approved by the board, for the faithful performance of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20204.3.

All bids for construction work submitted pursuant to this article shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

20205.1.

In case of an emergency, the board shall respond to the emergency pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050) if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20205.2.

Nothing in this article prohibits the board from doing or causing to be done directly by the district, and without any contract, any or all work necessary or proper in or about the making of all current and ordinary repairs or in or about current and ordinary upkeep or maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.1.

Upon the determination of the board by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of its members that all bids submitted are unsatisfactory or are excessive, the district may do any necessary and proper work and make any necessary and proper expenditures in lieu of contracting for the performance of such proposed work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.2.

Plans and specifications when once adopted shall not be altered or changed in any manner whereby the cost of the proposed work is increased, except by a majority vote of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.3.

A contract made under this article shall not be altered or changed in any manner, except when first ordered by a vote of two-thirds of the board, and with the consent of the contractor. The particular change or alteration shall be specified in writing and its cost agreed upon between the board and the contractor. In no case shall the board pay or become liable to pay for any extra work done or extra material furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.4.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the board may annually advertise for sealed bids for furnishing the district with goods, merchandise, stores, subsistence, printing, materials, and all other supplies, and advertising. The advertisement shall be published pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in the county in which the greater part of the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.5.

All bids shall be upon a schedule prepared by the clerk, showing all articles needed by the district and its several offices and stating separately the price of each article to be furnished. Any person may bid upon any article separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.6.

Notices of proposals for furnishing articles shall mention the articles in general and shall state that the conditions and schedule may be found in the office of the clerk of the district and that the articles are to be delivered at such times, in such quantities, and in such manner as the board may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20206.9.

The clerk shall furnish printed blanks for all proposals and contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.1.

In considering bids the board may accept or reject all or any of them, or may accept or reject part of a bid, preference being given to the lowest responsible bidder. The award as to each article shall in all cases be made to the lowest bidder for such article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.2.

All supplies furnished the district or its officers shall be furnished at a price no greater than is specified in the bid accepted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.3.

All bids shall be opened by the board at an hour and place to be stated in the advertisements for proposals, in the presence of all bidders who attend, and the bidders may inspect the bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.4.

All contracts shall be made with the lowest responsible bidder. Bidders for construction contracts shall give bonds for the faithful performance of the construction contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.5.

“Advertising” means the advertising and publication of all official reports, orders, ordinances, resolutions, notices inviting proposals, and all notices of every nature relating to work or business of the district. Advertising shall not be classified. No part or kind of advertising shall be charged or contracted for at a higher rate than any other part or kind is charged or contracted for, except in the case of the delinquent tax list. The advertising of the delinquent tax list shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder on a separate bidding from all other advertising. A square of advertising shall be 234 ems nonpareil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.6.

No officer or employee of the district shall order any article or make any publication which is not expressly authorized by this division or by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

20207.7.

Unless the amount involved in the purchase at any one time of any articles for which no contract has been entered into exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the board may purchase the articles without the necessity of advertising or letting contracts. Where the cost of any articles for which no contract has been entered into exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the board shall advertise for sealed bids for furnishing the district the articles. In the matter of advertising, opening and accepting bids, and the letting of contracts, the board shall proceed in all respects in the manner and form provided in the case of contracts for annual supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1414, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.7. Transit Districts [20209. - 20209.]

20209.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any transit district may negotiate the purchase from, or the sale to, any federal, state, or local public agency of any real or personal property upon terms and conditions agreed to by the district and the public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transit Districts—Alameda and Contra Costa Counties [20210. - 20214.]

20210.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by transit districts in the counties of Alameda or Contra Costa, as provided for in Part 1 (commencing with Section 24501) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20211.

(a) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents. 

(b) To the extent practicable, the district shall obtain a minimum of three
 quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), but does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). 

(c) The construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. 

(d) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation and on the district’s procurement Internet Web
 site, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   (AB 116)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

20212.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by a four-fifths vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20213.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20214.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Transportation Agencies [20216. - 20217.]

20216.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contract by the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, the Southern California Rapid Transit District, the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District, the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the North San Diego County Transit Development Board, a county transportation commission that is subject to the competitive negotiation provisions of Section 20229.1, 20231.5, or 20916.3 of this code, or Section 120224.4, 125228, or 130238 of the Public Utilities Code, a transit district, city, county, city and county, or transportation agency, that is subject to the competitive negotiation provisions of Section 20217, and any other transportation agency that is authorized to use comparable competitive negotiation provisions after July 1, 1992, shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(b) Other than proprietary information, the content of any request for proposal, any proposal received, and any other communications between a transportation agency and a potential bidder on a contract that is subject to subdivision (a) shall be made available to the public no later than the same time that a recommendation for awarding a contract is made to the governing board or persons responsible for approving the award of a contract to a bidder, except that the price proposed in any bidder’s initial proposal shall be available upon the opening of the bid by the agency requesting the proposal.

(c) No person may participate in the evaluation of any proposal for the award of a contract that is subject to subdivision (a) if any of the following conditions apply:

(1) The person has a financial interest in the outcome of the evaluation or the contract.

(2) The person has received a gift of over two hundred fifty dollars ($250) during the previous 12 months from a bidder directly, or indirectly through an intermediary, if it is known to the person that the gift was in whole or in part funded by the bidder.

(d) The agency board or any person responsible for awarding a contract under this article shall not have any ex parte communication with a bidder or any representative of the bidder except in writing and if the communication is made public.

(e) A contract may not be awarded until 15 days after the staff recommendation has been made available to the public.

(f) An agency using the competitive negotiation process shall maintain in writing, and make available upon request, a complete description of the process and the policies and procedures used by the agency in doing so, including all standards, criteria, public protest procedures, and method of contract award. The agency shall also keep a complete record of its actions on each procurement.

(g) For purposes of this section and Sections 20217, 20229.1, 20231.5, and 20916.3 of this code and Sections 120224.4 and 130238 of the Public Utilities Code, “competitive negotiation” means a procurement process used by an agency in lieu of a competitive sealed bid process when conditions are not appropriate for the use of sealed bids, and that permits the consideration of price, technical experience, past performance, management, or other factors in selecting the most cost-effective proposal for the manufacture and delivery of specified goods, transit vehicles, or equipment. The process includes negotiations with manufacturers or providers after the receipt of initial proposals during which performance or technical standards and other criteria may be revised in order to secure proposals most advantageous to the purchasing agency or to cure any deficiencies contained in the original proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20217.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the award of purchase contracts by transit agencies under competitive bid procedures may not be feasible for products and materials that are undergoing rapid technological changes or for the introduction of new technologies into agency operations, and that in these circumstances it is in the public interest to consider the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purpose, manufacturer’s warranty, vendor financing, performance reliability, standardization, life cycle costs, delivery timetables, support logistics, and other similar factors in addition to price in the award of these contracts.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of a transit district, city, county, city and county, or transportation agency may direct the purchase of (1) computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collection equipment, radio and microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus used in transit operations ; (2) specialized rail transit equipment, including, but not limited to, railcars; (3) buses; and (4) passenger ferries, by competitive negotiation upon a finding by two-thirds vote of all members of the board that the purchase of those products or materials in compliance with provisions of this code generally applicable to the purchase does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the agency’s needs. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(c) Competitive negotiation, for the purposes of this section includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) A request for proposals shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the agency in its discretion, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, a notice of the request for proposals shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which shall be made at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals. The agency shall make reasonable efforts to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources, and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposal is received.

(2) The request for proposals shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The agency shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(4) Prior to making an award, the agency shall prepare a price analysis and shall find that the final negotiated price is fair and reasonable based upon comparable procurement in the marketplace.

(5) The award shall be made to the qualified proposer whose proposal will be most advantageous to the agency with price and other factors considered. If the award is not made to the proposer whose proposal contains the lowest price, the agency shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(d) The agency may reject any and all proposals and issue a new request for proposals at its discretion.

(e) Upon making an award to a qualified proposer, the agency, upon request, shall make available to all other proposers and to the public, an analysis of the award that provides the basis for the selection of that particular qualified proposal.

(f) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal, may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section pursuant to protest procedures established by the board as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposals shall be filed with the agency within 10 calendar days after the request for proposals is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (c). The agency shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the agency within 15 calendar days after the staff recommendation for award has been made available to the public as required by subdivision (e) of Section 20216.

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the agency within 15 calendar days after the staff recommendation for award has been made available to the public as required by subdivision (e) of Section 20216.

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protesters shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the agency prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(g) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder. 

(h) As used in this section, “agency” includes a transit district, city, county, city and county, or transportation agency when engaged in transit operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 101, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District [20220. - 20229.1.]

20220.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, as provided for in Part 2 (commencing with Section 28500) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20221.

(a) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials when the expenditure required exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to requirements described in the solicitation documents. The construction of facilities and works when the expenditure required exceeds
 ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation. This publication shall be made at least 10 days before the bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(b) Whenever the expected procurement required exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) and, in the case of the construction of facilities and works, does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or, in the case of the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials, does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the district shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared.

(c) Where the expenditure required by the bid price is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the general manager may act for the board. When acting pursuant to this subdivision, the general manager shall, in each instance, promptly notify the board of the action taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   (AB 2030)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20221.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District may, at its discretion, elect to design and construct all or any part of the extension of the district’s transit facilities to the San Francisco International Airport. If the board elects to design and construct the project, it shall comply with all of the following procurement procedures:

(a) A request for qualifications shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of sources, as determined by the district, in its discretion, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of that portion of the extension the district has elected to design and construct in accordance with this section. In addition, notice of the request for qualifications shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be at least 10 days before responses to the request for qualifications are received. The request for qualifications shall identify the minimum standards that the district has determined, in its discretion, shall be met or exceeded by a contractor to successfully design and construct the project described in this section. Those standards may include, but are not limited to, technical experience and capability, financial condition and capacity, organization, and personnel.

(b) All respondents determined by the district to meet or exceed the minimum standards set forth in the request for qualifications shall be considered prequalified. The district may, in its discretion, repeat the prequalification process described in subdivision (a). If the district has prequalified at least three respondents, it may invite those prequalified to submit sealed bids for the project based upon plans and specifications prepared by the district. Only those who have been prequalified are eligible for award of a contract. Award shall be made to the prequalified bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid.

(c) The board may reject any and all bids and request new bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 988, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20222.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by a two-thirds vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20223.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a two-thirds vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20224.

Upon determining that immediate remedial measures to avert or alleviate damage to property, or to repair or restore damaged or destroyed property, of the district are necessary in order to insure that the facilities of the district are available to serve the transportation needs of the general public, and upon determining that available remedial measures, including procurement in compliance with Sections 20221, 20222, and 20223, are inadequate, the general manager may authorize the expenditure of money previously appropriated specifically by the board for the direct purchases of goods and services, without observance of the provisions of those sections.

The general manager shall, after any such expenditure, submit to the board a full report explaining the necessity for the action.
